Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2609
Court appointment of guardian of minor; venue.

The venue for guardianship proceedings for a minor is in the place where the minor resides or is present or where property is located if he is a nonresident of this state.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 227, UPC § 5-205.